Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
CHAPTER 4 Official Bonds

Cross references.

Giving of bonds by persons collecting tax, revenue, or other moneys on behalf of state, political subdivision, and other entities, §

45-8-2

et seq.

45-4-1.
Bonds to be payable to Governor and conditioned upon faithful discharge of duties.

The bonds of all public officers required by law to give bond, unless otherwise provided, shall be made payable to the Governor and his successor in office. In all cases in which a different condition is not prescribed, such bonds shall be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the duties of the office by the officer during the time he continues in the office or discharges any of its duties.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 143; Code 1868, § 138; Code 1873, § 148; Code 1882, § 148; Civil Code 1895, § 243; Civil Code 1910, § 278; Code 1933, § 89-402.

45-4-2.
Deputy’s bond.

Deputies shall give bonds with surety, payable to their principals, for their conduct as deputies, conditioned as and for the same amounts, unless otherwise provided by law, as their principals’ bonds. Such bonds shall be recorded in the same office and in the same manner as the bonds of the principals.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 157; Code 1868, § 152; Code 1873, § 163; Code 1882, § 163; Civil Code 1895, § 259; Civil Code 1910, § 294; Code 1933, § 89-426; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1779, §§ 2, 4.

45-4-3.
Return of bonds; actions on bonds.

All bonds taken by public officers under the laws of this state shall be returned to the offices specified by law; and any person interested therein may bring an action thereon, in his own name, in any court having jurisdiction thereof.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 15; Code 1868, § 13; Code 1873, § 13; Code 1882, § 13; Civil Code 1895, § 13; Civil Code 1910, § 13; Code 1933, § 89-905; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 34.

45-4-4.
Bonds of officers commissioned by Governor.

Official bonds of all officers who are entitled to commissions from the Governor and who are required to give bonds shall be prepared and furnished by the office of the Governor at the time of forwarding the dedimus potestatem.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 144; Code 1868, § 139; Code 1873, § 149; Code 1882, § 149; Civil Code 1895, § 244; Civil Code 1910, § 279; Code 1933, § 89-403; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Cross references.

Governor issuing a dedimus potestatem, §

45-12-20

.

45-4-5.
Bonds to have sureties; number and qualifications.

All bonds that this chapter applies to shall have at least two and not more than 20 good and solvent sureties who shall be worth the amount of said bond, over and above their homestead, in case of county officers, all of whom must be permanent residents of the state and two of whom must also be residents of the county; provided, however, that a surety insurance company which has complied with all requirements to transact business in this state may be accepted as surety upon the bond of any person required by law to execute bonds, in lieu of any other surety or sureties, as provided in Code Section 45-4-6. When the approving court or officers do not know that a surety is worth the required amount, they shall not accept him unless he swears that his means are sufficient in amount, which swearing they shall record on the bond.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 146; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 124, § 3; Code 1868, § 141; Code 1873, § 151; Code 1882, § 151; Ga. L. 1889, p. 45, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 246; Civil Code 1910, § 281; Code 1933, § 89-414.

Cross references.

Authorizing corporate surety in lieu of personal surety, §

33-24-48

.

45-4-6.
Corporate sureties authorized.

Guaranty or surety companies incorporated under the laws of this state or which have complied with all requirements to transact business in this state may become sureties upon the bonds of all state or county officers; and the various officers of this state whose duty it is to approve the sureties upon such bonds are authorized to accept such company or companies as one of the sureties or the only surety upon such bond, as the solvency of such company may warrant.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 178, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 247; Civil Code 1910, § 282; Code 1933, § 89-415.

Cross references.

Authorizing corporate surety in lieu of personal surety, §

33-24-48

.

45-4-7.
County officials required to have corporate surety on bond; county to pay premiums.

All county officials who are required to give an official bond shall make bond signed by some surety or guaranty company authorized to do business in this state. The premiums due on all such bonds must be paid by the county fiscal authorities out of county funds, and it shall be mandatory upon the county fiscal authorities in every county in the state to pay the premiums due on all such bonds out of county funds. This Code section shall not apply to county school superintendents’ bonds.

History.

Ga. L. 1947, p. 1543, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1190, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 741, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article on bond liability and righting the wrongs of Georgia local government officers, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

45-4-8.
Attorney at law or county officer not to be surety.

No attorney at law or county officer shall be accepted as surety on the bond of any county officer.

History.

Ga. L. 1876, p. 13, § 1; Code 1882, § 152; Civil Code 1895, § 248; Civil Code 1910, § 283; Code 1933, § 89-416.

45-4-9.
New bond and surety when surety relieved or insufficient.

The Governor shall require a new surety and bond for the performance of any public duty by any officer under this chapter when, in the Governor’s discretion:

The surety gives written notice to the Governor of his desire to be relieved from future liability for good cause stated and sworn to; or

The surety becomes insufficient, based upon satisfactory evidence.

History.

Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1036; Code 1863, § 164; Code 1868, § 159; Code 1873, § 170; Code 1882, § 170; Civil Code 1895, § 266; Civil Code 1910, § 301; Code 1933, § 89-424.

45-4-10.
Effect of officer failing to comply with new bond and surety.

If any officer shall fail to comply with the requisition of the Governor to furnish a new bond and surety within ten days from the date such officer is served personally with a copy of the executive order containing such requisition, he shall on account of such failure be removed from office and a vacancy declared.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 165; Code 1868, § 160; Code 1873, § 171; Code 1882, § 171; Civil Code 1895, § 267; Civil Code 1910, § 302; Code 1933, § 89-425.

45-4-11.
Blanket bonds covering two or more political subdivisions, officers authorized; amount and coverage period; recording; entities.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the several counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of this state, including independent school districts, are authorized to purchase blanket bonds in lieu of individual bonds. Blanket bonds may cover any two or more officers, officials, agents, and any other employees of such political subdivisions where they are required by law to be bonded.

A blanket bond shall be in an amount sufficient to cover all or certain specified individual bonds otherwise required by law to be purchased by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision. The blanket bond shall specify the dates of coverage, the positions or persons covered by the bond, and the persons or entities to whom or to which the bond is payable.

A blanket bond shall be signed by the judge of the probate court of the county wherein the county, municipality, or school district purchasing the blanket bond is located. The bond shall be filed and recorded in the office of the probate court. Such signing, filing, and recording shall be in lieu of any other endorsement, signing, filing, approval, or recording otherwise required by law for individual bonds. Where a municipality or school district is located in more than one county, the bond shall be signed, filed, and recorded by the probate judge of the county within which the municipality or school district is predominately located based upon population.

In addition to any other guaranty or surety companies authorized by this chapter, a blanket bond may be offered by an interlocal risk management agency created pursuant to Chapter 85 of Title 36 or Article 29 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 and may be in the form of a copy of an original annual coverage agreement providing the blanket bond.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 480, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 978, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article on bond liability and righting the wrongs of Georgia local government officers, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

45-4-12.
Approval and filing of bonds.

The approval of all official bonds shall be in writing, endorsed on the bonds, and shall show the day and year on which they were approved; and such bonds shall not be filed until thus approved.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 145; Code 1868, § 140; Code 1873, § 150; Code 1882, § 150; Civil Code 1895, § 245; Civil Code 1910, § 280; Code 1933, § 89-404.

45-4-13.
Approval, filing, and recording of bonds of court clerks, magistrates, sheriffs, coroners, surveyors, treasurers, and tax collectors.

The official bonds given for county taxes by the clerks of the superior courts, chief magistrates, magistrates, sheriffs, coroners, county surveyors, county treasurers, county tax collectors, and county tax receivers shall be approved by the judge of the probate court, filed in his office, and recorded by him. The bonds of tax collectors and tax receivers for state taxes, after being likewise approved, shall be recorded by the judge of the probate court; and the original bond shall be transmitted by him to the Governor for deposit in the comptroller general’s office.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 155; Code 1868, § 150; Code 1873, § 161; Code 1882, § 161; Civil Code 1895, § 257; Civil Code 1910, § 292; Code 1933, § 89-405; Ga. L. 1989, p. 247, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

45-4-14.
Time for filing bonds.

The official bonds of public officers, required by law to be filed in the office of the comptroller general, Secretary of State or with the office of the Governor, shall be filed within 40 days after the election or appointment of such officers. All county officers shall have until the first day of January following the election to file their bonds as required by law.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 148; Ga. L. 1863-64, p. 124, § 1; Code 1868, § 143; Code 1873, § 154; Ga. L. 1875, p. 16, § 1; Code 1882, § 154; Civil Code 1895, § 250; Ga. L. 1898, p. 105, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 285; Code 1933, § 89-408; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45; Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 45/HB 79.

45-4-15.
Filing time to be endorsed on bonds.

Every officer in whose office the official bond of any public officer is filed shall endorse on such bond the day and year when the same was filed and shall sign his name to such endorsement.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 151; Code 1868, § 146; Code 1873, § 157; Code 1882, § 157; Civil Code 1895, § 253; Civil Code 1910, § 288; Code 1933, § 89-411.

45-4-16.
Manner in which power of attorney to be attested and filed where bond signed by attorney in fact.

When an official bond is signed by an attorney in fact, the power of attorney shall be attested by the judge of the probate court and filed and recorded in the same manner as the bond.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 147; Code 1868, § 142; Code 1873, § 153; Code 1882, § 153; Civil Code 1895, § 249; Civil Code 1910, § 284; Code 1933, § 89-417.

45-4-17.
Probate court judge to certify to Governor taking of oaths and giving of bonds.

The judge of the probate court must sign a certificate to the Governor stating that the clerks of the superior courts, chief magistrates, magistrates, sheriffs, coroners, county surveyors, county treasurers, county tax collectors, and county tax receivers have taken the oaths and given the bonds sent from the office of the Governor, together with a statement of the dates, amounts, and names of the sureties of each and that the judges of the probate court have delivered to such officers their commissions. The certificate and statement shall be attested by the clerk of said court, if any, and immediately transmitted to the Governor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 156; Code 1868, § 151; Code 1873, § 162; Code 1882, § 162; Civil Code 1895, § 258; Civil Code 1910, § 293; Code 1933, § 89-406; Ga. L. 1989, p. 247, § 2.

45-4-18.
Certification of failure of officer to make and file bond.

When any officer of whom bond is required shall fail to make and file the same, as prescribed in Code Section 45-4-14, the court or officer in whose office the bond is required to be filed shall at once certify such failure to the appointing power and to the power whose duty it may be to order an election.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 149; Code 1868, § 144; Code 1873, § 155; Code 1882, § 155; Civil Code 1895, § 251; Civil Code 1910, § 286; Code 1933, § 89-409.

45-4-19.
Notice to Attorney General of failure of officer to file bond.

If any public officer required by law to give bond shall fail to file the same in the proper office within the time prescribed, notice of such failure shall be given to the Attorney General or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney by the officer in whose office such bond is required to be filed, by or during the first two days of the session of the superior court held in the county in which the officer so failing resides, next after such failure.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 152; Code 1868, § 147; Code 1873, § 158; Code 1882, § 158; Civil Code 1895, § 254; Civil Code 1910, § 289; Code 1933, § 89-412.

45-4-20.
Nonconforming bond to stand in place of official bond though not approved and filed.

Whenever any officer required by law to give an official bond shall act under a bond which is not payable and conditioned or not approved and filed as prescribed by law, such bond shall not be void but shall stand in the place of the official bond, subject, on its condition being broken, to all the remedies, including actions, which the persons aggrieved might have maintained on the official bond.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 161; Code 1868, § 156; Code 1873, § 167; Code 1882, § 167; Civil Code 1895, § 263; Civil Code 1910, § 298; Code 1933, § 89-419.

45-4-21.
Effect of failure of officer to mark bond or give required notice.

If any officer whose duty it is to mark a bond filed and to give the several notices required in this chapter shall fail to do so without good and sufficient excuse, he shall be fined as for a contempt of court, in the discretion of the court, upon information being filed and a citation being served to appear before the superior court of the county of his residence.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 153; Code 1868, § 148; Code 1873, § 159; Code 1882, § 159; Civil Code 1895, § 255; Civil Code 1910, § 290; Code 1933, § 89-413.

45-4-22.
Effect of official act before bond approved and filed.

No public officer required by law to give bond shall perform any official act before his bond is approved and filed as required.

Any such public officer who shall perform any official act before his bond is approved and filed shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 150; Code 1868, § 145; Code 1873, § 156; Code 1882, § 156; Ga. L. 1895, p. 63, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 252; Penal Code 1895, § 272; Civil Code 1910, § 287; Penal Code 1910, § 275; Code 1933, §§ 89-410, 89-9902.

45-4-23.
Places for keeping bonds.

All bonds taken from public officers shall be kept in the places specified by law and copies thereof shall be furnished to any person desiring them.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 14; Code 1868, § 12; Code 1873, § 12; Code 1882, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 12; Civil Code 1910, § 12; Code 1933, § 89-407.

45-4-24.
Bond obligations of principal and surety; conditions required for existence of cause of action on bond.

Every official bond executed under this chapter is obligatory on the principal and sureties thereon:

For any breach of the condition during the time the officer shall continue in office or discharge any of the duties thereof;

For any breach of the condition by a deputy, although not expressed in such bond, unless otherwise declared by law;

For the faithful discharge of any duties which may be required of such officer by any law passed subsequent to the execution of such bond, although no such condition is expressed therein; or

For the use and benefit of every person who is injured, either by any wrongful act committed under color of his office or by his failure to perform or by the improper or neglectful performance of those duties imposed by law.

No claim or cause of action shall exist against the bond, the surety, or the principal, and no claim or cause of action for indemnification by the surety against the principal shall exist, unless one of the following conditions exists:

The principal personally benefits financially from the act complained of; or

The principal was personally aware of and had actual knowledge of the act complained of; had actual knowledge that the act was illegal, contrary to law, or the breach of a duty imposed by law; and either acted to cause or failed to prevent the act complained of.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 154; Code 1868, § 149; Code 1873, § 160; Code 1882, § 160; Civil Code 1895, § 256; Civil Code 1910, § 291; Code 1933, § 89-418; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1089, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

Law reviews.

For article considering the public official’s potential liability for funds, losses and torts, and suggesting insurance coverage, see 11 Mercer L. Rev. 288 (1960).

For article on bond liability and righting the wrongs of Georgia local government officers, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

45-4-25.
Actions on bonds of public officers authorized; jurisdiction.

Actions on bonds taken from public officers may be brought by any person aggrieved by the official misconduct of the officer, in his own name, in any court in this state having jurisdiction thereof, without an order for that purpose. No such action shall be instituted or maintained in any other state. Except as authorized in this Code section, actions on bonds taken from public officers shall be brought in the name of the Governor and by his written consent or by the written consent of the obligee named in such bond, for the use of such aggrieved person; provided, however, that no action on the bond of any public officer of the state to recover damages flowing to the state or the public on account of the official misconduct of such officer shall be instituted or maintained unless brought in the name of the Governor for the use of the state and by his written authorization. Any such action on the bond of any public officer of any county or other political subdivision of the state to recover damages flowing to such county or other political subdivision or the public shall not be instituted or maintained unless brought in the name of the obligee in such bond for the use of such political subdivision and by the written authorization of the governing body of such political subdivision.

History.

Ga. L. 1853-54, p. 57, § 1; Orig. Code 1863, § 14; Code 1868, § 12; Code 1873, § 12; Code 1882, § 12; Civil Code 1895, § 12; Civil Code 1910, § 12; Code 1933, § 89-420; Ga. L. 1959, p. 411, § 1.

Cross references.

Substitution of parties in action against public officer when officer dies, resigns, etc., during pendency of action, §

9-11-25

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1959, p. 411, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall be deemed to be remedial in nature and shall be given retrospective application. It shall apply to pending suits. The plaintiff in any action on the bond of any public officer of the State of Georgia then pending in any court outside of the State of Georgia may dismiss such action and renew the same in any court of this state having jurisdiction thereof within six months from March 18, 1959. In default thereof, the privilege granted by this section by the state is withdrawn and such action shall abate. Any such renewal action shall be deemed to have been filed on the same date as any such original suit.

45-4-26.
Action on deputy’s bond.

Any person who claims damages of any principal officer for the act of his deputy may, at his option, bring an action on the deputy’s bond instead of on that of the principal, in the same manner as an action may be brought on the principal’s bond.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 158; Code 1868, § 153; Code 1873, § 164; Code 1882, § 164; Civil Code 1895, § 260; Civil Code 1910, § 295; Code 1933, § 89-427.

45-4-27.
Effect of recovery on bond upon subsequent proceedings.

Official bonds of public officers shall not be discharged by a single recovery, but proceedings against the officer or his sureties or both may be had from time to time until the whole penalty is exhausted; and said bonds are joint and several whether or not so set forth.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 502; Code 1863, § 159; Code 1868, § 154; Code 1873, § 165; Code 1882, § 165; Civil Code 1895, § 261; Civil Code 1910, § 296; Code 1933, § 89-422.

45-4-28.
Officer’s liability when bond exhausted or invalid and when acting without bond.

When the penalty of the bond is exhausted, the officer himself shall still be liable for the same measure of damages as upon his bond; and he shall likewise be liable for any damage he may do in undertaking to discharge the duties of an office without having given the necessary bond or having given one that is invalid in whole or in part.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 160; Code 1868, § 155; Code 1873, § 166; Code 1882, § 166; Civil Code 1895, § 262; Civil Code 1910, § 297; Code 1933, § 89-423.

45-4-29.
Measure of damages in actions on official bonds.

The measure of damages recoverable in actions upon all official bonds for the misconduct of the officer, unless otherwise specially enacted, shall be the amount of injury actually sustained, including the reasonable expenses of the action to the plaintiff and the costs of court. In all cases when little or no damage is actually sustained and the officer has not acted in good faith, the jury may find for the plaintiff an amount as exemplary damages which, taking all the circumstances together, shall not be excessive or oppressive.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 162; Code 1868, § 157; Code 1873, § 168; Code 1882, § 168; Civil Code 1895, § 264; Civil Code 1910, § 299; Code 1933, § 89-421; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

History of Code section.

This section is derived partially from the decisions in Taylor v. Johnson,

17 Ga. 521

(1885); Dobbs v. Justices of Murray County,

17 Ga. 624

(1885).

Cross references.

Amount of judgments on bonds generally, §

9-12-13

.

Law reviews.

For article on bond liability and righting the wrongs of Georgia local government officers, see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979).

45-4-30.
Applicability of chapter.

This chapter shall apply to the official bonds of all public officers of this state, including those whose offices may be established hereafter, unless the contrary is expressly provided.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 163; Code 1868, § 158; Code 1873, § 169; Code 1882, § 169; Civil Code 1895, § 265; Civil Code 1910, § 300; Code 1933, § 89-401.